pt-PT: Tipo de caixa de armazenamento: Caixa de alumínio; Caixa de cartão; Sem caixa; Caixa de plástico; Saco de transporte flexível; Caixa de madeira; Outro
fr: Type d’étui de rangement: Étui en aluminium; Boîte en carton; Sans étui; Étui en plastique; Sac de transport souple; Boîte en bois; Autre
el: Τύπος θήκης αποθήκευσης: Θήκη αλουμινίου; Κουτί από χαρτόνι; Χωρίς θήκη; Πλαστική θήκη; Μαλακή τσάντα μεταφοράς; Ξύλινο κουτί; Άλλο
es: Tipo de caja de almacenamiento: Estuche de aluminio; Caja de cartón; Sin estuche; Estuche de plástico; Bolsa de transporte blanda; Caja de madera; Otro
de: Art des Aufbewahrungskoffers: Aluminiumkoffer; Karton; Ohne Koffer/Etui; Kunststoffkoffer; Tragetasche; Holzkiste; Andere
zh-TW: 收納盒類型: 鋁製收納盒; 紙箱; 無收納盒; 塑膠收納盒; 軟便攜袋; 木箱; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta kovčka za shranjevanje: Aluminijast kovček; Kartonska škatla; Brez etuija; Plastičen kovček; Mehka prenosna torba; Lesena škatla; Drugo
it: Tipo di custodia di stoccaggio: Custodia in alluminio; Scatola di cartone; Nessuna custodia; Custodia in plastica; Borsa da trasporto morbida; Scatola di legno; Altro
pl: Typ etui do przechowywania: Aluminiowa walizka; Kartonowe pudełko; Brak etui; Plastikowe etui; Miękka torba do przenoszenia; Drewniane pudełko; Inne
ru: Тип кейса для хранения: Алюминиевый кейс; Картонная коробка; Без чехла/кейса; Пластиковый кейс; Мягкая сумка для переноски; Деревянная коробка; Другое
lt-LT: Laikymo dėklo tipas: Aliuminis dėklas; Kartoninė dėžutė; Be dėklo; Plastikinis dėklas; Minkštas krepšys; Medinė dėžutė; Kita
fi: Säilytyskotelon tyyppi: Alumiinikotelo; Pahvilaatikko; Ei koteloa; Muovikotelo; Pehmeä kantokassi; Puulaatikko; Muu
zh-CN: 收纳盒类型: 铝制外壳; 纸板箱; 无包装盒; 塑料外壳; 软便携袋; 木箱; 其他
cs: Typ úložného obalu: Hliníkový kufřík; Kartonová krabice; Bez pouzdra; Plastový kufřík; Měkká přepravní taška; Dřevěná krabice; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta kutije za skladištenje: Aluminijski kovčeg; Kartonska kutija; Bez kovčega; Plastični kovčeg; Mekana torba za nošenje; Drvena kutija; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estojo de armazenamento tipo: Estojo de alumínio; Caixa de papelão; Sem estojo; Estojo de plástico; Bolsa de transporte flexível; Caixa de madeira; Outro
da: Type af opbevaringsetui: Aluminiumskuffert; Papkasse; Intet etui; Plastiketui; Blød bæretaske; Trækasse; Andet
tr: Saklama kabı tipi: Alüminyum çanta; Karton kutu; Çantasız; Plastik çanta; Yumuşak taşıma çantası; Ahşap kutu; Diğer
sv: Lagringstyp: Aluminiumväska; Pappkartong; Inget fodral; Plastväska; Mjuk bärväska; Trälåda; Övrigt
en: Storage case type: Aluminum case; Cardboard box; No case; Plastic case; Soft carrying bag; Wooden box; Other
nb: Type oppbevaringseske: Aluminiumskoffert; Pappeske; Uten etui; Plastkoffert; Myk bæreveske; Trekasse; Annet
ko: 보관 케이스 유형: 알루미늄 케이스; 골판지 상자; 케이스 없음; 플라스틱 케이스; 소프트 캐리 백; 나무 상자; 기타
bg-BG: Тип на кутията/калъфа за съхранение: Алуминиев калъф; Картонена кутия; Без калъф; Пластмасов калъф; Мека чанта за носене; Дървена кутия; Друго
ja: 収納ケースタイプ: アルミケース; 段ボール箱; ケースなし; プラスチックケース; ソフトキャリングバッグ; 木箱; その他
th: ประเภทการจัดเก็บ: เคสอะลูมิเนียม; กล่องกระดาษแข็ง; ไม่มีเคส; เคสพลาสติก; กระเป๋าพกพาแบบนิ่ม; กล่องไม้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de recipient de depozitare: Casetă din aluminiu; Cutie din carton; Fără casetă; Casetă din plastic; Geantă de transport moale; Cutie din lemn; Altele
sk-SK: Typ úložného priestoru: Hliníkový kufrík; Kartónová škatuľa; Bez puzdra; Plastový kufrík; Mäkká prenosná taška; Drevená škatuľa; Iné
vi: Loại hộp đựng: Hộp nhôm; Hộp giấy cứng; Không có hộp đựng; Hộp nhựa; Túi đựng mềm; Hộp gỗ; Khác
hu: Tároló doboz típusa: Alumínium tok; Kartondoboz; Nincs tok; Műanyag tok; Puha hordtáska; Fadoboz; Egyéb
nl: Opbergdoos type: Aluminium koffer; Kartonnen doos; Geen koffer; Plastic koffer; Zachte draagtas; Houten doos; Overig